Utah statutes.
63A-3-303.   Notice to debtor -- Contents.

(1)  Upon default in payment of any account receivable that is not due pursuant to final court or administrative order or judgment, the entity responsible for collecting the account shall send a notice by mail to the debtor at the debtor's last-known address.

(2)  The notice shall state:

(a)  the date and amount of the receivable;

(b)  a demand for immediate payment of the amount;

(c)  a statement of the right of the debtor to file a written response to the notice, to have a hearing, to be represented at the hearing, and to appeal any decision of the hearing examiner;

(d)  the time within which a written response must be filed; and

(e)  a statement notifying the debtor that the state may obtain an order under this part and execute upon income tax overpayments or refunds of the debtor if:

(i)  the debtor fails to respond to the notice; or

(ii)  a hearing is held and the hearing officer decides against the debtor.



Amended by Chapter 79, 2011 General Session

